Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2905
Affected premises, defined.

Affected premises means premises upon which is or was located an affected animal, herd, or flock or suspected affected animal, herd, flock, or disease agent of a dangerous disease.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 5.
November 14, 2020